src-fst-morphology-stems-verb_header.lexc.md
Model verb lemmas and stems for new crk FST

LEXICON VERBSTEMS

osâwâw:osâwâ VIIw ;
miskwâw:miskwâ VIIw ;
nîpin:nîpin3 VIIn ;
mispon VIIn_PL ; ! only occurs in plural
pimamon VIIn ;
mâthâtan:mâthâtan3 VIIn ;
mîthwâsin VIIn ;

apiw:api VAIw ;
atoskîw:atoskî VAIw ;
mâtow:mâto VAIio ;
mîcisow:mîciso VAIio ;
nîhithawîw:nîhithawî VAIw ;
nipâw:nipâ VAIae ;
pimisin:pimisin3 VAIn ;

kâtâw:kâtâ VTIw ;
kîsihtâw:kîsihtâ VTIw ;
mîciw:mîci VTIw ;
wâpahtam:wâpaht4a VTIm ; ! Check status of -a
nâtam:nâta VTIm ;

kîskiswîw:kîskisw VTA;  ! w:0 for collapsing cases
nitonawîw:nitonaw VTA ;
atoskahîw:atoskah VTA ;
miskawêw:miskaw VTA ;
mowîw:mow2 VTA ;        ! w2:w for non-collapsing cases
nakatîw:nakat3 VTA ;        ! t3:s in some cases
nâtîw:nât3 VTAt ;
itîw:it3 VTAi ;
wâpamîw:wâpam VTA ;
wîcihîw:wîcih VTA ;
mîstasîhkawîwak:mîstasîhkaw VTA_PL ; !'generally' plural according to LLR

Full incorporation of LLR 2022 verbs into new cwd FST

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/stems/verb_header.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-cwd/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/stems/verb_header.lexc)</small>
